src/fst/stems/pron.lexc
!! # Pronouns
!! Pronouns are a closed special sub class of nouns. Morphologically pronouns
!! have often defective, heteroclitic or otherwise irregular inflectional
!! patterns, and certain pronouns have an morphophonologically distinct
!! accusative case, extinct from other noun classes 
!!
!! Further reading: [VISK §§ 
!! 100|http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisalto.php?p=100] – 104, Semantics ...
!! [VISK § 7XX](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisalto.php?p=7XX)
! FIXME: pronouns have stem variations and inflections listed, it doesn't
! matter a big deal but might as well do it the same way as rest of the things
! to get systematic benefits from lexicon <=> morph structure.

LEXICON PRON_AINOA

:a	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

+Sg:a	PRON_BACK_SINGULARS_OPTPOSS ;

:a	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_OPTPOSS ;

:a	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN_OPTPOSS ;

:a	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IN_OPTPOSS ;

:	PRON_BACK_PLURALS_OPTPOSS ;

:	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA_OPTPOSS ;

:	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN_OPTPOSS ;

+Use/NG:	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN_OPTPOSS ;

:	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN_OPTPOSS ;

:	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN_OPTPOSS ;


LEXICON PRON_ERÄS

:	PRON_FRONT_PLURALS ;

:	PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ ;

:	PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN ;

+Use/NG:	PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;

:	PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN ;

:	PRON_FRONT_H_PLURALS_ARCHAIC ;

+Sg:s	PRON_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;

:s	PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;

:ä	PRON_FRONT_SINGULARS ;

+Sg:ä	PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_N ;

:ä	PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;


LEXICON PRON_HÄN

!:e	PRON_FRONT_SINGULARS ;
! PRON_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS
+Ess:e%>nä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!PRON_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS
+Abe:e%>ttä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Abl:e%>ltä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Ade:e%>llä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+All:e%>lle	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Ela:e%>stä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Ine:e%>ssä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Tra:e%>ksi	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!:e	PRON_FRONT_ACCUSATIVE_T ;
+Acc:e%>t	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!:e	PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_N ;
+Gen:e%>n	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!:e	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
+Ill:e%>en	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Ill+Use/Arch:e%>hen	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

!:	PRON_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
+Nom:	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!:	PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
+Par:%>tä	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_HÄÄ

:	PRON_FRONT_SINGULARS ;

:ä	PRON_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;


LEXICON PRON_IKINEN

+Sg:nen	PRON_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;

:se	PRON_FRONT_SINGULARS ;

+Sg:se	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;

:se	PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;

:s	PRON_FRONT_PLURALS ;

:s	PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;

:s	PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ ;

:s	PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:s	PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN ;

:s	PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN ;


LEXICON PRON_ITSE

+Sg:	PRON_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;

+Sg:	PRON_FRONT_SINGULARS_OPTPOSS ;

+Sg:	PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_N ;

:	PRON_FRONT_PLURALS_OPTPOSS ;

:	PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;

:	PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN_OPTPOSS ;

:	PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ_OPTPOSS ;

:	PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN_OPTPOSS ;

:	PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN_OPTPOSS ;

:	PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN_OPTPOSS ;


LEXICON PRON_JOKA

:ka	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

+Pl+Gen:idenka	# ;

+Use/NG+Pl+Gen:ittenka	# ;

+Pl+Nom:tka	# ;

+Sg+Gen:nka	# ;

+Sg+Ill:honka	# ;

+Sg+Ill:nne	# ;

+Sg:	PRON_BACK_SINGULARS ;

:	PRON_BACK_PLURALS ;

:	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;

:	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON ;

:	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;

:	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN ;

+Use/NG:	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;

:	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;


LEXICON PRON_JOKAINEN

:nen	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

+Sg:se	PRON_BACK_SINGULARS ;

:se	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;

+Sg:se	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;

:s	PRON_BACK_PLURALS ;

:s	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;

:s	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA ;

:s	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:s	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN ;

:s	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN ;


LEXICON PRON_JOKIN

:kin	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

+Pl+Abl:iltain	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Abl:iltakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Abl+Dial/Finland:iltai	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:illain	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:illakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade+Dial/Finland:illai	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+All:illekin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:istain	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:istakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela+Dial/Finland:istai	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ess:inain	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ess:inakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ess+Dial/Finland:inai	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:idenkin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Use/NG+Pl+Gen:ittenkin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:ihinkin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:issain	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:issakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine+Dial/Finland:issai	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Nom:tkin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Par:itain	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Par:itakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Par+Dial/Finland:itai	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:iksikin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:ltain	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:ltakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl+Dial/Finland:ltai	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:llain	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:llakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade+Dial/Finland:llai	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+All:llekin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:stain	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:stakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela+Dial/Finland:stai	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess:nain	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess:nakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess+Dial/Finland:nai	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:nkin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:honkin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:nnekin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:ssain	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:ssakin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Par:tain	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Par:takin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Par+Dial/Finland:tai	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Tra:ksikin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Tra+Dial/Finland:kski	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_JOKU

:ku	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

+Pl+Abl:iltakuilta	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:illakuilla	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+All:illekuille	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:istakuista	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ess:inakuina	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:idenkuiden	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Use/NG+Pl+Gen:ittenkuitten	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:ihinkuihin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:issakuissa	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Nom:tkut	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Par:itakuita	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:iksikuiksi	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:ltakulta	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:llakulla	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+All:llekulle	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:stakusta	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess:nakuna	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:nkun	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:honkuhun	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:ssakussa	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Par:takuta	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Tra:ksikuksi	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_JOMPIKUMPI

+Pl+Abl:miltakummilta	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:millakummilla	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+All:millekummille	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:mistakummista	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ess:pinakumpina	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:pienkumpien	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:piinkumpiin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:missakummissa	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Nom:matkummat	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Par:piakumpia	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:miksikummiksi	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:maltakummalta	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:mallakummalla	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+All:mallekummalle	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:mastakummasta	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess:panakumpana	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:mankumman	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:paankumpaan	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:massakummassa	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Par:paakumpaa	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Tra:maksikummaksi	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

:pikumpi	PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;


LEXICON PRON_KAIKKI

:e	PRON_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS_OPTPOSS ;

+Sg:e	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;

:ke	PRON_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS_OPTPOSS ;

:ke	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;

:ke	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;

:ke	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IN_OPTPOSS ;

:k	PRON_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS_OPTPOSS ;

:k	PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA_OPTPOSS ;

:k	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN_OPTPOSS ;

:k	PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN_OPTPOSS ;

+Sg+Nom:ki	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:ket	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Nom:ki	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

:	PRON_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS_OPTPOSS ;

+Dial/Finland+Sg+Nom:	# ;

LEXICON PRONOUN
hän+Pron+Pers+Sg3:hän    PRON_HÄN        ;
kaikki+Pron+Qu:kaik        PRON_KAIKKI     ;
eräs+Pron:erä  PRON_ERÄS  ;
hää+Pron:hä  PRON_HÄÄ  ;
itse+Pron:itse  PRON_ITSE  ;
joka+Pron:jo  PRON_JOKA  ;
joka% ainoa+Pron:joka% aino  PRON_AINOA  ;
joka% ikinen+Pron:joka% iki  PRON_IKINEN  ;
jokainen+Pron:jokai  PRON_JOKAINEN  ;
jok’ikinen+Pron:jok’iki  PRON_JOKAINEN  ;
jokin+Pron:jo  PRON_JOKIN  ;
joku+Pron:jo  PRON_JOKU  ;
jokunen+Pron:joku  PRON_JOKAINEN  ;
jompikumpi+Pron:jom  PRON_JOMPIKUMPI  ;
kumpainen+Pron:kumpai  PRON_JOKAINEN  ;
monituinen+Pron:monitui  PRON_JOKAINEN  ;
